Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 4. Electrical Safety

§ 30-3-401.
Electric installations and equipment.

The inspector shall adopt rules for electrical installation and equipment safety requirements for mines. The rules shall establish:

Placement and other safety requirements for high potential power lines;

Placement, housing, cooling, encasing and other access restrictions for transformers;

Mounting requirements for pull switches, circuit breakers and other power controls and requirements for entrances, illumination and clearances for switchboards;

Standards for the installation and support of power lines and cables, including track used as a power conductor, trolley wires and feeder wires. The rules shall require that, where practicable, power be disconnected during repair work and shall include required protective clothing and equipment for persons repairing power lines and cables, and trolley wire and feeder wire;

Installation requirements and load restrictions for signal wires;

Standards for the use of electrical equipment and testing standards at specific areas of the mine, including areas containing specified levels of methane or other explosive gases.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 30-76; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-413; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§§ 30-3-402 through 30-3-411.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1951, ch. 128, §§ 44-49 and 51-53, related to electrical safety in mines.